Utah statutes.
51-9-407.   Intoxicated Driver Rehabilitation Account share of surcharge.
The Division of Finance shall allocate 7.5% of the collected surcharge
established in Section 51-9-401, but not to exceed the amount appropriated by
the Legislature, to the Intoxicated Driver Rehabilitation Account established
by Section 62A-15-503.
